Georgia statutes. TITLE 53 Wills, Trusts, and Administration of Estates
CHAPTER 6 Administrators and Personal Representatives

Cross references.

Time limitation on actions against administrators and executors, §

9-3-27

.

Petitions for declaratory judgments involving acts by executors and administrators, questions arising in administration of estates or trusts, §

9-4-4

.

Jurisdiction of judge of probate court to grant administration on estates generally, §

15-9-31

.

Editor’s notes.

This chapter was effective January 1, 1998, to the extent that no vested rights of title, year’s support, succession, or inheritance are impaired, as provided by the version of Code Section 53-1-1 enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10, as amended by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1352, § 1.

Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10, effective January 1, 1998, repealed the Code sections formerly codified at this chapter, and enacted the current chapter.
The former chapter consisted of §§

53-6-1

through

53-6-1

51, and was based on Laws 1764, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, pp. 302, 304, 305; Laws 1784, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 304; Laws 1789, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 305; Laws 1792, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, pp. 306-309; Laws 1799, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, pp. 311, 312; Laws 1805, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 283; Laws 1807, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 315; Laws 1808, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 283; Laws 1810, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 316; Laws 1827, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 294; Laws 1828, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 327; Laws 1839, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 286; Laws 1847, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 377; Laws 1850, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, pp. 340, 341; Ga. L. 1851-52, p. 49, § 1; Ga. L. 1851-52, p. 99, § 1; Ga. L. 1851-52, p. 100, § 1; Ga. L. 1855-56, p. 146, § 1; Ga. L. 1855-56, p. 228, § 3; Ga. L. 1859, p. 33, §§ 3, 6; Ga. L. 1860, p. 32, § 1; Orig. Code 1863, §§ 2395,
2403-2405, 2408, 2410, 2411, 2414, 2416, 2418, 2456-2461, 2464-2467, 2547-2555, 2571-2574; Laws 1864, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 303; Ga. L. 1865-66, p. 29, § 1; Ga. L. 1865-66, p. 30, § 3; Ga. L. 1865-66, p. 83, § 1; Ga. L. 1866, p. 66, §§ 1, 2; Code 1868, §§ 2391, 2399-2401, 2404, 2406, 2407, 2410, 2412, 2414, 2451-2458, 2461, 2463-2465, 2548-2553, 2555, 2556,
2573-2576; Ga. L. 1868, p. 25, § 1; Code 1873, §§ 2426, 2434-2436, 2439, 2441, 2442, 2445, 2448, 2450, 2487-2494, 2498, 2500, 2502-2504, 2554, 2589-2597, 2614-2618; Ga. L. 1876, p. 36, § 1; Code 1882, §§ 2426, 2434, 2435, 2436, 2439, 2441, 2442, 2445, 2448, 2450, 2488-2494, 2497, 2498, 2500, 2502-2504, 2589-2597, 2614-2618; Ga. L. 1882-83, p. 79, §§ 1-14; Ga. L. 1893, p. 36, § 1; Civil Code 1895, §§ 3284, 3293-3295, 3308, 3310, 3311, 3313, 3316, 3318, 3359, 3360, 3362-3367, 3371, 3372, 3376-3389, 3393-3395, 3484-3492, 3521-3525; Ga. L. 1903, p. 75, §§ 1, 2; Civil Code 1910, §§ 3858, 3867-3869, 3884, 3886, 3887, 3889, 3892, 3894, 3935, 3936, 3938-3940, 3943, 3947, 3948, 3952-3965, 3969-3971, 4062-4072, 4101-4105; Ga. L. 1929, p. 168, § 1; Code 1933, §§ 113-1101, 113-1102, 113-1201, 113-1202, 113-1205 through 113-1215, 113-1221, 113-1227, 113-1228, 113-1301 through 113-1314, 113-1503, 113-2001 through 113-2011, 113-2401 through 113-2406; Ga. L. 1943, p. 416, §§ 1-6; Ga. L. 1947, p. 1448, §§ 1-4; Ga. L. 1952, p. 87, §§ 1-3; Ga. L. 1958, p. 657, §§ 23, 25; Ga. L. 1962, p. 122, § 1; Ga. L. 1962, p. 610, § 1; Ga. L. 1962, p. 613, § 1; Ga. L. 1964, p. 300, § 1; Ga. L. 1969, p. 1139, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1970, p. 523, § 1; Ga. L. 1972, p. 449, § 1; Ga. L. 1973, p. 481, § 1; Ga. L. 1973, p. 547, §§ 1-3; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1509, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 1325, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 547, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 53; Ga. L. 1982, p. 2107, § 53; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 53; Ga. L. 1984, p. 937, §§ 2-4; Ga. L. 1986, p. 200, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 477, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 539, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 371, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 914, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1990, p. 350, §§ 2, 3; Ga. L. 1991, p. 394, §§ 3, 4; Ga. L. 1991, p. 810, § 10; Ga. L. 1992, p. 983, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1173, § 3.

Law reviews.

For annual survey of law of wills, trusts, and administration of estates, see 40 Mercer L. Rev. 471 (1988).